Utah statutes.
10-7-5.   Limitations on lease or purchase.

It is not lawful for any city or town to lease or purchase any part of such waterworks less than the whole, or to lease the same, unless the contract therefor shall provide that the city or town shall have control thereof and that the net revenues therefrom shall be divided proportionately to the interests of the parties thereto; said contract shall also provide a list of water rates to be enforced during the term of such contract.

